Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HCR2029.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 28.1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-2823, to read: START_STATUTE36-2823. Nonprofit medical marijuana dispensaries; independent third-party laboratories; prohibited locations NOtwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the director may not issue a nonprofit medical marijuana dispensary registration certificate or certify an independent third-party laboratory at a location in unincorporated territory that is surrounded on all sides by an Indian reservation in this state. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 36, chapter 28.2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-2866, to read: START_STATUTE36-2866. Marijuana establishments; marijuana testing facilities; prohibited locations Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the director may not issue a marijuana establishment license or a marijuana testing facility license at a location in unincorporated territory that is surrounded on all sides by an Indian reservation in this state. END_STATUTE 2. The Secretary of State shall submit this proposition to the voters at the next general election as provided by article IV, part 1, section 1, Constitution of Arizona.